Louisiana, session 2026, HB11.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 1:58.10 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§58.10. A day of remembrance for Charlie Kirk
The fourteenth day of October shall be annually recognized and designated
as a day of remembrance for Charlie Kirk throughout the state of Louisiana.